Vermont, session 2025-2026, H942.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
* * * Water Quality Training * * *
Sec. 1. 6 V.S.A. § 4981 is amended to read:
§ 4981. AGRICULTURAL WATER QUALITY TRAINING
(a) On or before July 1, 2016, as part of the revisions of the Required
Agricultural Practices, the The Secretary of Agriculture, Food and Markets
shall may adopt by rule requirements for training classes or programs for
owners or operators of small farms, medium farms, or large farms certified or
permitted under this chapter regarding:
(1) the prevention of discharges, as that term is defined in 10 V.S.A.
§ 1251(3); and
(2) the mitigation and management of stormwater runoff, as that term is
defined in 10 V.S.A. § 1264, from farms.
(b) Any training required under this section shall may address:
(1) the existing statutory and regulatory requirements for operation of a
large, medium, or small farm in the State;
(2) the management practices and technical and financial resources
available to assist in compliance with statutory or regulatory agricultural
requirements;
VT LEG #390260 v.1

No. 167 Page 2 of 19
2026
(3) the land application of manure or nutrients, methods or techniques to
minimize the runoff of land-applied manure or nutrients to waters of the State,
and identification of weather or soil conditions that increase the risk of runoff
of land-applied manure or nutrients to waters of the State; and
(4) standards required for nutrient management, including nutrient
management planning; or
(5) best management practices and other techniques for improving farm
practices or water quality.
(c) The Secretary shall may include the training required by this section
requirements as a condition of a large farm permit, medium farm permit, or
small farm certification required under this chapter, or may require any farm
operator or owner to participate in assigned training when the Secretary
determines additional water quality education is appropriate. The Secretary
may phase in training requirements under this section based on farm size,
permit or certification category, or available staffing. On or before July 1,
2017, the Secretary shall establish a schedule by which all owners or operators
of small farms, medium farms, or large farms shall complete the training
required by this section.
(d) The Secretary may approve or authorize the training required by this
section to be conducted by other entities, including the University of Vermont
Extension Service and the natural resources conservation districts, to perform
any training described in this section.
VT LEG #390260 v.1

No. 167 Page 3 of 19
2026
(e) The Secretary shall not charge the owner or operator of a large,
medium, or small farm for the any training required by this section the
Secretary requires. The Secretary shall provide or pay for the any training
required under this section from funds available to the Agency of Agriculture,
Food and Markets for water quality initiatives.
(f) As of July 1, 2026, the mandatory water quality training requirements in
the Required Agricultural Practices Rule are repealed, and the Secretary may
prospectively determine appropriate training requirements as described by this
section.
* * * Managing Non-Sewage Waste * * *
Sec. 2. 6 V.S.A. § 4817 is amended to read:
§ 4817. MANAGEMENT OF NON-SEWAGE WASTE
(a) As used in this section:
(1) “Non-sewage waste” means any waste other than sewage that may
contain organisms pathogenic to human beings but does not mean stormwater
runoff.
(2) “Sewage” means waste containing human fecal coliform and other
potential pathogenic organisms from sanitary waste and used water from any
building, including carriage water and shower and wash water. “Sewage” does
not mean stormwater runoff as that term is defined in 10 V.S.A. § 1264.
VT LEG #390260 v.1

No. 167 Page 4 of 19
2026
(3) “Waste materials” means non-sewage solid or liquid digestates from
certified solid waste facilities or materials approved by the Secretary of the
Agency of Natural Resources for acceptable use under the Solid Waste Rules.
(b)(1) The Secretary may require This section shall apply to a person
transporting or arranging for the transport of the following:
(A) non-sewage waste to a farm for deposit in a manure pit or for use
as an input in a methane digester; or
(B) waste materials to a farm for storage, land application, deposit in
a manure pit, or use in a methane digester.
(2) to A person subject to this section shall obtain approval from the
Secretary prior to transporting the non-sewage waste or waste materials to the
any farm. The Secretary may require a person to report to the Secretary at a
designated time one or more of the following provide the following
information to evaluate a request to transport the described materials to a farm:
(1)(A) the composition of the material transported proposed for
transport to the a farm, including the source of the material; and
(B) laboratory test results for every nutrient or contaminant that the
Secretary requires the applicant to identify in the material; and
(2)(C) the volume of the material transported proposed for transport to a
farm.
VT LEG #390260 v.1

No. 167 Page 5 of 19
2026
(c) A person the Secretary approves to transport non-sewage waste or
waste materials to a farm shall report the following information as frequently
as the Secretary requires:
(1) the composition of the material transported to a farm, including the
source of the material;
(2) laboratory test results for every nutrient or contaminant that the
Secretary requires the person to identify in the material; and
(3) the volume of the material transported to a farm.
(d) After receipt of a an application or report required under subsection (b)
or (c) of this section, the Secretary may prohibit the import of non-sewage
waste or waste materials onto a farm upon a determination that the import of
importing the material would violate the farm’s nutrient management plan for
the farm or otherwise present a threat to the environment, human health, plants,
soils, or water quality.
(e) Nothing in this section shall affect the authority of the Secretary of
Natural Resources to regulate wastes under 10 V.S.A. chapter 159 (waste
management) or 10 V.S.A. chapter 47 (water pollution control).
* * * Retail Pricing Standards * * *
Sec. 3. 6 V.S.A. chapter 37 is amended to read
CHAPTER 37. UNIT RETAIL PRICING
VT LEG #390260 v.1

No. 167 Page 6 of 19
2026
§ 680. PURPOSE
The purpose of this chapter is to promote and facilitate the following
objectives:
(1) protect consumers, promote accuracy, and encourage constructive
and useful competition in the sale of consumer commodities when an
individual is physically present to complete transactions;
(2) encourage the development and use of consumer commodity pricing
that facilitates informed consumer choices when purchasing consumer
commodities;
(3) prohibit misleading or deceptive consumer commodity pricing
practices; and
(4) promote a level playing field for retail businesses by providing clear
rules for businesses to follow while ensuring informed consumer choices.
§ 681. DEFINITIONS
As used in this chapter:
(1) “Secretary” means the Secretary of Agriculture, Food and Markets.
(2) “Consumer commodity” means any food, drug, device, or cosmetic
and other article, product, or commodity of any other kind or class, except for
drugs sold only by prescription or food sold by a restaurant or made-to-order,
including:
(A) that are customarily produced for sale to retail sales agencies or
instrumentalities items retail establishments customarily sell to individuals for
VT LEG #390260 v.1

No. 167 Page 7 of 19
2026
consumption by individuals, for or use by individuals for purposes of for
personal care, or in the performance of to perform services ordinarily that are
often rendered in or around the household; and
(B) that usually are consumed or expended in the course of such
during consumption or use.
(3) “Unit price” means the total selling price of a consumer commodity
means the retail price of a consumer commodity expressed in terms of the
retail price of such commodity per such by the price per standard unit of
weight, measure, or count as the Secretary designates, computed to the nearest
whole cent or fraction thereof as the Secretary designates, area, or length as
adopted by the National Council on Weights and Measures and published by
the National Institute of Standards and Technology in Handbook 130, Uniform
Laws and Regulations in the Areas of Legal Metrology and Fuel Quality.
(4) “Convenience store” means a type of retail establishment that sells a
limited number of everyday items such as motor fuel, tobacco products, made-
to-order food, snacks, and beverages that serve as a quick, accessible retail
option for consumers who typically purchase a small number of products, and
that does not offer a sufficient quantity of consumer commodities to make unit
pricing as useful to consumers. “Convenience store” does not include a
grocery store, drug store, dollar store, or any other type of store. The Secretary
has the discretion to determine whether a retail establishment is a convenience
store.
VT LEG #390260 v.1

No. 167 Page 8 of 19
2026
(5) “Electronic shelf label” is an electronic display that retailers can use
to present a product’s name, price, unit price, and other information on a small
wired or wireless panel, usually on the edge of a store shelf.
(6) “Individual” means any person, partnership, company, corporation,
association, or society.
(7) “Limited time” or “limited-time” means a period of not more than 60
days.
(8) “Made-to-order” means food prepared at the time of order or sold
from retail cases displaying product in bulk or in servings prepared on the
premises. Made-to-order foods may be sold by weight, measure, or count,
including piece, portion, or serving. Made-to-order food does not include
ready-to-eat foods that are prepackaged for an individual to select.
(9) “Real-time dynamic pricing” means a pricing strategy that allows
prices to change immediately based on evolving market trends and demand.
(10) “Retail establishment” means a store that sells consumer
commodities to individuals when they are physically present to inspect, select,
and purchase product, except when a store is primarily engaged in selling food
for consumption on the premises, or is primarily engaged in a specialty trade
that the Secretary determines would be unreasonable to regulate as a retail
establishment.
VT LEG #390260 v.1

No. 167 Page 9 of 19
2026
(11) “Retail space” means an area that a retail establishment operates or
controls where individuals may inspect and select consumer commodities for
purchase.
(12) “Total selling price” means the price assigned to a consumer
commodity and at which said consumer commodity is to be, and is, sold to an
individual.
§ 682. CONSUMER INFORMATION REQUIRED
(a) Every person who retail establishment that sells, offers for sale, or
exposes any consumer commodity for sale at retail any aluminum foil, bread,
carbonated soft drinks, cereals, cooking oils, dog or cat food, facial tissues,
fish, fowl, fruits, grains, meats, napkins, plastic food wrapping, vegetables,
waxed paper, or other consumer commodity designated by the Secretary shall
disclose to the consumer the unit price of the consumer commodity as provided
in this chapter individuals the accurate total selling price of that commodity.
(b) Every person who retail establishment that sells, offers for sale, or
exposes for sale at retail any consumer commodity shall disclose to the
consumer individuals the total price of the consumer accurate unit price of that
commodity as provided in this chapter.
§ 683. MEANS OF DISCLOSURE
Persons subject to the requirements of section 682 of this title shall disclose
the unit price and total price to consumers in one or more of the following
appropriate ways:
VT LEG #390260 v.1

No. 167 Page 10 of 19
2026
(1) if the consumer commodity is so located that it is not conspicuously
visible to the consumer, or if the consumer commodity is so located that the
price information if displayed in accordance with subdivision (2) of this
section would not be conspicuously visible to the consumer, by a sign or list
bearing the price information, conspicuously placed near the point of
procurement;
(2) by attachment of a stamp, tag, or label directly adjacent to the
consumer commodity, on the shelf on which the commodity is displayed, or by
stamping or affixing the price information on the commodity itself; or
(3) in accord with rules adopted by the Secretary.
(a) Every retail establishment shall disclose the total selling price and unit
price in compliance with the standards adopted and amended by the National
Council on Weights and Measures and published by the National Institute of
Standards and Technology in Handbook 130, Uniform Laws and Regulations
in the Areas of Legal Metrology and Fuel Quality.
(b) The words “Unit Price” shall appear adjacent to the displayed unit
price.
(c) The total selling price and unit price information shall include a
description of the commodity, and size, and be physically located on the
commodity, or as close as practical to it while clearly identifying the applicable
commodity.
VT LEG #390260 v.1

No. 167 Page 11 of 19
2026
(d) The total selling price and unit price information shall be presented
boldly, clearly, and conspicuously and shall be as large as practical and not
smaller than 7/32 inch in height.
(e) The total selling price and unit price information shall exclude any
deposit as part of the price but shall indicate that a deposit is required when a
deposit is required.
(f) The total selling price shall be simultaneously displayed to individuals
at each check-out location as consumer commodities are processed at the point
of sale to allow consumers an opportunity to assess prices and inquire about all
prices that may be inaccurate.
(g) The use of electronic shelf labels to increase prices or otherwise use
real-time dynamic pricing to increase prices when a retail establishment is
open to the public is prohibited. Retail establishments may only increase
prices on electronic shelf labels during business hours to correct genuine and
documented pricing errors and shall inform individuals present in the store of
the price correction.
§ 683a. REQUIRED COMPLIANCE AND ENFORCEMENT
Retail establishments are responsible for furnishing accurate price
information to individuals and are subject to enforcement for any violations of
this chapter, including violation of requirements adopted by this chapter found
in Handbook 130, Uniform Laws and Regulations in the Areas of Legal
Metrology and Fuel Quality.
VT LEG #390260 v.1

No. 167 Page 12 of 19
2026
* * *
§ 685. SECRETARY’S POWERS
The Secretary shall may:
(1) Designate by regulation those consumer commodities in addition to
the consumer commodities specifically enumerated in subsection 682(a) of this
title as to which display of the unit price shall be required, upon a
determination that such display will be in the best interests of consumers.
(2) Designate by regulation the unit of weight, measure, or count in
terms of which the unit price of each consumer commodity shall be expressed,
provided that no designated unit shall be such as to require persons subject to
the provisions of subsection 682(a) of this title to measure any consumer
commodity solely for the purpose of complying with subsection 682(a) of this
title.
(3) Designate by regulation whether the unit price of each consumer
commodity subject to the provisions of subsection 682(a) of this title shall be
expressed to the nearest whole cent or to an appropriate fraction thereof.
(4) Exempt by regulation classes exempt any class of retail
establishments from any or all requirements of this chapter upon a
determination that, because sales if the Secretary determines that the sale of
consumer commodities regulated by this chapter are purely is incidental to the
business of such classes class of retail establishments establishments’ business,
or that compliance with this chapter is impracticable unreasonable and
VT LEG #390260 v.1

No. 167 Page 13 of 19
2026
unnecessary for adequate protection of consumers. to adequately protect
individuals; and
(5) Prescribe by regulation means for the disclosure of price information
upon determination that they are more effective than those prescribed in
section 683 of this title.
(6)(2) Adopt any other adopt rules necessary to effectuate the provisions
of this chapter, in accordance with the best interests of consumers.
(7) Adopt rules addressing the method of price disclosure in the sale of
home food service plans, including not only the price of the commodities sold
but the service costs or membership fees associated with such a purchase.
These rules shall take precedence over any uniform regulation adopted by the
National Conference on Weights and Measures and published by the National
Institute of Standards and Technology.
§ 686. EXCEPTIONS EXEMPTIONS
(a) The unit price requirements of this chapter shall not apply to sales of
consumer commodities commodity sales as follows:
(1) At a retail store with less than 7,000 square feet of floor space
dedicated to the sale of consumer commodities. This exception exemption
shall not apply to the sales agencies or instrumentalities retail establishments of
a company having two or more sales agencies or instrumentalities locations as
parts of that company.
VT LEG #390260 v.1

No. 167 Page 14 of 19
2026
(2) For use or consumption on the premises where sold Convenience
stores.
(3) When different brands or products are commingled in one receptacle
for a limited-time one-priced sale.
(4) When commodities are individually marked with a clearance or sale
tag and are located in a clearance or limited-time sale section of the store.
Clearance or limited-time sale sections may be on a shelf or multiple shelves,
or in another defined area of the store.
(5) When the unit price is identical to the total selling price.
(6) When the item falls into one of the following categories:
(A) seasonal decorations; or
(B) beverages subject to the Federal Alcohol Administration Act
packing and labeling requirements.
(b) The total selling price requirements of this chapter shall not apply when
all items in a retail establishment have the same total selling price.
§ 687. PENALTY
A person who violates this chapter shall be fined not more than $500.00
retail establishment that violates this chapter is subject to the penalties and
provisions in sections 15, 16, and 17 of this title.
* * * Equine Farming; Use Value Appraisal Recommendations * * *
Sec. 4. EQUINE FARMING AND USE VALUE APPRAISAL STUDY;
REPORT
VT LEG #390260 v.1

No. 167 Page 15 of 19
2026
(a) The Commissioner of Taxes shall study and provide recommendations
for including equine farming in the Use Value Appraisal Program. The
Commissioner shall submit the recommendations to the House Committees on
Agriculture, Food Resiliency, and Forestry and on Ways and Means and the
Senate Committees on Agriculture and on Finance on or before December 15,
2026. The Commissioner’s recommendations shall include an analysis of the
potential fiscal impact of permitting agricultural land and farm buildings that
are used for equine farming to enroll in the Use Value Appraisal Program.
(b) As used in this section:
(1) “Agricultural land” has the same meaning as in 32 V.S.A. § 3752(1).
(2) “Equine farming” means the raising, feeding, or management of four
or more equines owned or boarded by a farmer for gain or profit, including
training, showing, and providing instruction and lessons in riding, training, and
the management of equines.
(3) “Farm buildings” has the same meaning as in 32 V.S.A. § 3752(14).
(4) “Farmer” has the same meaning as in 32 V.S.A. § 3752(7).
* * * Community Development Initiatives * * *
Sec. 5. 10 V.S.A. § 325m is amended to read:
§ 325m. RURAL ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT INITIATIVE
(a) Definitions. As used in this subchapter:
(1) “Rural area” means a county of the State designated as “rural” or
“mostly rural” by the U.S. Census Bureau in its most recent decennial census.
VT LEG #390260 v.1

No. 167 Page 16 of 19
2026
(2) “Small town” means a town in the State with a population of less
than 5,000 at the date of the most recent U.S. Census Bureau decennial census.
(3) “Community development initiatives” means priority projects
located throughout the State that support agriculture, historic preservation,
outdoor recreation, and other critical economic development needs, which may
be supported when State resources or staffing assistance is not available.
(b) Establishment. There is created the Rural Economic Development
Initiative to be administered by the Vermont Housing and Conservation Board
for the purpose of promoting and facilitating community economic
development in the small towns and rural areas of the State, and supporting
community development initiatives. The Rural Economic Development
Initiative shall collaborate with municipalities, businesses, regional
development corporations, regional planning commissions, and other
appropriate entities to access funding and other assistance available to small
towns and businesses primarily in rural areas of the State when existing State
resources or staffing assistance is not available.
(c) Services; access to funding. The Rural Economic Development
Initiative shall provide the following services to small towns and businesses
primarily in rural areas:
(1) identification of grant or other funding opportunities that facilitate
business development, infrastructure development, or other economic
development opportunities; or
VT LEG #390260 v.1

No. 167 Page 17 of 19
2026
(2) technical assistance in writing grants, accessing other funding,
coordination with providers of grants or other funding, strategic planning for
the implementation or timing of activities funded by grants or other funding,
and compliance with the requirements of grant awards or awards of other
funding.
(d) Priority. In providing services under this section, the Rural Economic
Development Initiative shall give first priority to projects that have received
necessary State or municipal approval and that are ready for construction or
implementation.
(e) Priority projects. The Rural Economic Development Initiative shall
seek to assist include the following priority types of projects:
(1) milk plants, milk handlers, or dairy products, as those terms are
defined in 6 V.S.A. § 2672;
(2) outdoor recreation and equipment enterprises;
(3) value-added food and forest products enterprises;
(4) farm operations, including phosphorus removal technology for farm
operations;
(5) coworking or business generator and accelerator spaces;
(6) commercial composting facilities; and
(7) restoration and rehabilitation of historic buildings in community
centers.
VT LEG #390260 v.1

No. 167 Page 18 of 19
2026
(f) Coordination. In providing services under this section, the Rural
Economic Development Initiative shall coordinate with the Secretary of
Commerce and Community Development, regional development corporations,
and regional planning commissions.
(g) Report. Beginning on January 31, 2019, and annually thereafter, the
Rural Economic Development Initiative shall submit to the Senate Committees
on Agriculture and on Economic Development, Housing and General Affairs
and the House Committees on Agriculture, Food Resiliency, and Forestry and
on Commerce and Economic Development a report regarding the activities and
progress of the Initiative as part of the report of the Vermont Farm and Forest
Viability Program. The report shall summarize the Initiative’s activities in the
preceding year; evaluate the effectiveness of the services provided by the
Initiative; provide an accounting of the grants or other funding that the
Initiative facilitated or helped secure; and recommend any changes to the
program to further economic development in small towns and rural areas of the
State.
* * * Farm and Forestry Operations Security Special Fund * * *
Sec. 6. 6 V.S.A. § 4643(e) is amended to read:
(e) All administratively complete applications shall be evaluated by the
Review Board. Within 15 days following receipt of an administratively
complete application, the Review Board by majority vote shall recommend to
the Secretary whether to issue a payment to the applicant. If the Review Board
VT LEG #390260 v.1

No. 167 Page 19 of 19
2026
recommends an award under this section, the The Secretary shall issue the
award make a final award determination within 15 days following the date of
the Review Board’s recommendation.
* * * Effective Date * * *
Sec. 7. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
Date Governor signed bill: June 18, 2026
VT LEG #390260 v.1